Illinois, session 104th, SB1954.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Counties Code is amended by adding Division 53-16 as follows: 6    (55 ILCS 5/Div. 3-16 heading new)7Division 3-16. Recall of Countywide Elected Officials 8    (55 ILCS 5/3-16001 new)9    Sec. 3-16001. Recall of a countywide elected official. 10    (a) Sangamon County may establish a process by which 11countywide elected officials may be recalled by the electors 12of the county, by submitting the proposition to the electors 13of the county and obtaining their approval of the proposition 14at a referendum held at the general election of 2026 as 15provided in Section 3-16002. A referendum to adopt a process 16by which countywide elected officials may be recalled by the 17electors may be called for by a resolution adopted before the 18general election of 2026 by the county board of Sangamon 19County.20    (b) As used in this Division, "countywide elected 21official" means a county officer who holds an elective office 22under Article 3 of this Code, but it does not include an   SB1954 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 10305 JDS 20379 b1officer who is elected by electors outside of Sangamon County. 2    (55 ILCS 5/3-16002 new)3    Sec. 3-16002. Referendum on resolution of county board.4    (a) If the county board of Sangamon County adopts a 5resolution calling for a referendum at the general election of 62026 on the proposal to adopt a process by which countywide 7elected officials of Sangamon County may be recalled by the 8electors of Sangamon County, within the time provided in the 9general election law, the county clerk and county board of 10Sangamon County shall provide for the submission of the 11proposition to the electors of Sangamon County in accordance 12with this Section at the general election of 2026.13    (b) The referendum shall be conducted in such a manner as 14is prescribed in the general election law.15    The proposition shall be in substantially the following 16form: 17-------------------------------------------------------------18    Shall Sangamon19County adopt a process20by which countywide elected                        YES21officials may be recalled -----------------------------------22by the electors of the county                       NO23as provided for by Section243-16003 of the Counties Code?25-------------------------------------------------------------   SB1954 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 10305 JDS 20379 b1    (55 ILCS 5/3-16003 new)2    Sec. 3-16003. Recall of countywide elected officials. 3    (a) If the referendum described in Section 3-16002 is 4approved by a majority of the voters voting on the 5proposition, then the recall of countywide elected officials 6of Sangamon County may thereafter be proposed by a petition 7signed by a number of electors equal in number to at least 15% 8of the total votes cast for Governor in that county in the 9preceding gubernatorial election. A petition under this 10Section shall have been signed by the petitioning electors not 11more than 150 days after an affidavit has been filed with the 12State Board of Elections providing notice of intent to 13circulate a petition to recall the countywide elected 14official. The affidavit may be filed no sooner than 6 months 15after the beginning of the countywide elected official's term 16of office and may not be filed in the last 6 months of the 17countywide elected official's term of office. 18    (b) The form of the petition, circulation, and procedure 19for determining the validity and sufficiency of a petition 20shall be as provided by law. If the petition is valid and 21sufficient, the State Board of Elections shall certify the 22petition not more than 50 days after the date the petition was 23filed, and the question "Shall (name) be recalled from the 24office of (name of office)?" must be submitted to the electors 25of Sangamon County at a special election called by the State   SB1954 Engrossed- 4 -LRB104 10305 JDS 20379 b1Board of Elections, to occur not more than 100 days after 2certification of the petition. A recall petition certified by 3the State Board of Elections under this Section may not be 4withdrawn and another recall petition under this Section may 5not be initiated against the countywide elected official 6during the remainder of the official's current term of office. 7Any recall petition or recall election pending on the date of 8the next general election at which a candidate for the same 9countywide office is elected is moot.10    (c) The countywide elected official is immediately removed 11upon certification of the recall election results if a 12majority of the electors voting on the question vote to recall 13the countywide elected official. If the countywide elected 14official is removed, the vacancy shall be filled as provided 15in the Election Code or this Code.  16    (55 ILCS 5/3-16004 new)17    Sec. 3-16004. Repealer. This Division is repealed on 18January 1, 2027. 19    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 20becoming law.